Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2541.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 256B.4905, subdivision 5a, is amended to read: Subd. 5a. Employment first implementation for disability waiver services. new text begin (a) new text end The commissioner of human services shall ensure that: (1) the disability waivers under sections 256B.092 and 256B.49 support the presumption that all working-age Minnesotans with disabilities can work and achieve competitive integrated employment with appropriate services and supports, as needed; and (2) each waiver recipient of working age be offered, after an informed decision-making process and during a person-centered planning process, the opportunity to work and earn a competitive wage before being offered exclusively day services as defined in section 245D.03, subdivision 1, paragraph (c), clause (4), or successor provisions. new text begin (b) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the commissioner of human services must not adopt any rule or implement any policy that: new text end new text begin (1) eliminates, reduces, or limits availability of day services as defined in section 245D.03, subdivision 1, paragraph (c), clause (4), or successor provisions; or new text end new text begin (2) restricts a waiver recipient's ability to earn a special minimum wage under either a 14(c) certificate issued by the United States Department of Labor under United States Code, title 29, section 214(c), of the Fair Labor Standards Act, or a permit issued by the Department of Labor and Industry under section 177.28. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end